Hawaii statutes.
§846E-3 Access to registration information.
(a) Registration information shall be disclosed as follows:

(1) The information shall be disclosed to law
enforcement agencies for law enforcement purposes;

(2) The information shall be disclosed to government
agencies conducting confidential background checks; and

(3) The attorney general and any county police
department shall release public information as provided in subsection (b)
concerning a specific person required to register under this chapter; provided
that the identity of a victim of an offense that requires registration under
this chapter shall not be released.

(b) For purposes of this section, "public
information" means:

(1) Name, prior names, nicknames and pseudonyms, and
all aliases used by the covered offender or under which the covered offender
has been known;

(2) The year of the covered offender's date of birth
and the year of the covered offender's alias dates of birth;

(3) A physical description of the covered offender,
including a description of particular identifying characteristics such as scars
or tattoos;

(4) The actual address where the covered offender
resides or any current, temporary address where the covered offender resides
or, if an address is not available, a description of any place or area in which
the covered offender resides for at least thirty nonconsecutive days within a
sixty-day period, and, for each address or place where the covered offender
resides, how long the covered offender has resided there;

(5) The actual address or description of the place or
area where the covered offender is staying for more than ten days, if other
than the stated residence, and the actual length of time of the stay;

(6) The future actual address, if known, where the
covered offender is planning to reside, if other than the stated residence;

(7) The street name and zip code of the covered
offender's current locations of employment, including information for any place
where the covered offender works as a volunteer or otherwise works without
remuneration;

(8) For covered offenders who may not have a fixed
place of employment, a description of the places where such a covered offender
works;

(9) Professional licenses held by the covered
offender;

(10) Names and actual addresses of current and known
future educational institutions with which the covered offender is affiliated
as a faculty member, an employee, or a student, and the starting and ending
dates of any such affiliation;

(11) The year, make, model, color, and license number
of all vehicles, including automobiles, watercrafts, and aircrafts, currently
owned or operated by the covered offender, excluding vehicles operated
exclusively for purposes of work;

(12) A statement listing all covered offenses for
which the covered offender has been convicted or found unfit to proceed or
acquitted pursuant to chapter 704;

(13) Judgment of conviction, judgment of acquittal, or
judicial determination of unfitness to proceed documenting the criminal offense
or offenses for which the covered offender is registered;

(14) The text, or an electronic link to the text, of
the provision of law defining the criminal offense or offenses for which the
covered offender is registered; and

(15) A recent photograph of the covered offender.

The identity of any victim of a sexual offense
shall not be disclosed and any documentation containing such information shall
be redacted to prevent disclosure.

(c) To facilitate community notification,
after a covered offender registers or updates a registration, the attorney
general may provide public information in the registry about that offender to
any organization, company, or individual who requests such notification
pursuant to procedures established by the attorney general through rules
adopted pursuant to chapter 91.

(d) A covered offender may seek correction of
erroneous public information by petitioning the attorney general to make the
correction. If the covered offender is not satisfied with the decision of the
attorney general on the request for correction, the covered offender may appeal
the decision pursuant to chapter 91.

(e) Public access to a covered offender's
public information shall be permitted with regard to each covered offender
beginning the next working day following the filing of a judgment of
conviction, a finding of unfitness to proceed or an acquittal due to mental
disease, disorder, or defect, for a covered offense, or as soon thereafter as
is practical. When a notice of appeal has been filed, the public information
shall note that the covered offender has filed a notice of appeal. The public
information shall be removed upon the reversal of the covered offender's
conviction or the granting of a pardon to the covered offender.

(f) Public access authorized by this section
shall be provided by both public internet access and on-site public access;
provided that on-site public access shall be provided for each covered offender
at the Hawaii criminal justice data center and at one or more designated police
stations in each county, to be designated by the attorney general, between the
hours of 8:00 a.m. and 4:30 p.m. on weekdays, excluding holidays.

(g) Public access to the public information
for each covered offender shall be permitted while the covered offender is
subject to sex offender registration, except that after forty years have
elapsed after release or sentencing, whichever is later, a covered offender may
petition the court in a civil proceeding to terminate public access. In the
civil proceeding to terminate public access, the State shall be represented by
the attorney general; provided that the attorney general, with the prosecuting
agency's consent, may designate the prosecuting agency that prosecuted the
covered offender for the most recent covered offense within the State to
represent the State. For covered offenders who have never been convicted of a
covered offense within the State of Hawaii, the attorney general shall
represent the State; provided that the attorney general, with the prosecuting
agency's consent, may designate the prosecuting agency for the county in which
the covered offender resides to represent the State. The court may order this
termination upon substantial evidence and more than proof by a preponderance of
the evidence that:

(1) The covered offender has had no new convictions
for covered offenses;

(2) The covered offender is very unlikely to commit a
covered offense ever again; and

(3) Public access to the covered offender's public
information will not assist in protecting the safety of the public or any
member thereof;

provided that a denial by the court for relief
pursuant to a petition under this section shall preclude the filing of another
petition for five years from the date of the last denial.

(h) If a covered offender has been convicted of
only one covered offense and that covered offense is a misdemeanor, the covered
offender shall not be subject to the public access requirements set forth in
this section.

(i) The following message shall be posted at
both the site of internet access and on-site public access locations:

"Information regarding
covered offenders is permitted pursuant to chapter 846E. Public access to this
information is based solely on the fact of each offender's criminal conviction
and is not based on an estimate of the offender's level of dangerousness. By
allowing public access to this information, the State makes no representation
as to whether the covered offenders listed are dangerous. Any person who uses
the information in this registry to injure, harass, or commit a criminal act
against any person included in the registry may be subject to criminal
prosecution, civil liability, or both."

(j) The public access provisions of this
section shall apply to all covered offenders without regard to the date of
conviction.

(k) "Conviction" as used in this
section means:

(1) A judgment on the verdict, or a finding of guilt
after a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, excluding the adjudication of a
minor;

(2) A finding of unfitness to proceed resulting in
the release of the covered offender into the community, excluding such a
finding as to a minor; or

(3) An acquittal due to a physical or mental disease,
disorder, or defect pursuant to chapter 704 resulting in the release of the
covered offender into the community, excluding such acquittal as to a minor. [L
1997, c 316, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 194, §3; am L 2002, c 234, §2; am L 2003, c
62, §5; am L 2004, c 59, §3; am L 2005, c 45, §5; am L 2006, c 106, §3; am L
2008, c 80, §6]

Case Notes

As this section operated to deprive defendant of a protected
liberty interest and provided defendant with neither notice nor an opportunity
to be heard prior to notifying the public of defendant's status as a convicted
sex offender, this section denied defendant due process under article I, §5 of
the Hawaii constitution; this section is thus void and unenforceable. 97 H.
285, 36 P.3d 1255 (2001).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next